Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1209
Failure to register tranquilizer guns; penalty.

(1) Any person who fails or neglects to register any gun or other device designed, adapted or used for projecting darts or other missiles containing tranquilizers or other chemicals or compounds which will produce unconsciousness or temporary disability in live animals, with the county sheriff of the county in which the owner of the gun or device resides, commits the offense of failure to register tranquilizer guns.

(2) Failure to register tranquilizer guns is a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 241.